Tennessee, session 114, HB1630.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-6-208(d), is amended by deleting
the first sentence of the subsection and substituting:
The sums collected by the administrator as provided in this section must be
deposited by the administrator in a special fund, which must be termed the "subsequent
injury and vocational recovery fund", to be disbursed by the administrator only for the
purposes stated in this section, for costs associated with legal counsel to defend the
administrator in actions claiming compensation from the subsequent injury and
vocational recovery fund pursuant to this section, for costs associated with providing
vocational recovery assistance to eligible employees pursuant to subsection (i), and for
costs associated with implementing and maintaining a computer system for the bureau
of workers' compensation.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-6-235(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "petition" and substituting "file a motion with".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-6-235(a)(2), is amended by
deleting "respond to the petition in a timely fashion" and substituting "comply with the court's
order".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-6-239(c)(3), is amended by
deleting "request for hearing" and substituting "petition for benefit determination".
HB1630
010033
- 1 -

SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-6-242(a)(2)(A), is amended by
deleting "an impairment rating of at least ten percent (10%) to the body as whole, that has been
determined according to the AMA guides as defined by § 50-6-102, by the authorized treating
physician" and substituting "impairment ratings totaling at least ten percent (10%) to the body as
whole, that have been determined according to the AMA guides, by the authorized treating
physicians".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-6-242(a)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting "physician has" and substituting "physicians have" and by further deleting "physician's
certification" and substituting "physicians' certifications".
SECTION 7. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010033